en: Transformed in France
ca: Transformat a França
de: Verarbeitet in Frankreich
es: Transformado en Francia
fi: Prosessoitu Ranskassa
fr: Transformé en France
it: Lavorato in Francia
pt: Transformado em França, transformad na França

en: Packaged in France
bg: Опаковано във Франция
ca: Envasat a França
de: Verpackt in Frankreich
es: Empacado en Francia
fi: Pakattu Ranskassa
fr: Conditionné en France
he: נארז בצרפת
hu: Franciaországban csomagolva
it: Confezionato in Francia
nl: Verpakt in Frankrijk
pt: Embalado em França, embalado na França, empacotado em França, empacotado na França

en: from 100% hellenic durum wheat
xx: from 100% hellenic durum wheat

en: Made in Italy, product of Italy
bg: Произведено в Италия
ca: Fet a Itàlia
cs: Vyrobeno v Itálii
da: Fremstillet i Italien
de: Hergestellt in Italien
es: Fabricado en Italia, Producido en Italia
fi: Valmistettu Italiassa
fr: Fabriqué en Italie
he: נוצר באיטליה
hr: proizvedeno u Italiji
hu: Olaszországban készült
it: Prodotto in Italia, fatto in Italia
nl: Geproduceerd in Italië
pl: Wyprodukowano we Włoszech
pt: Feito na Itália, produzido em Itália, fabricado em Itália
sv: Tillverkad i Italien
th: ผลิตในอิตาลี

en: Made in Luxembourg
bg: Произведено в Люксембург
da: Fremstillet i Luxemburg
es: Hecho en Luxemburgo
fi: Valmistettu Luxemburgissa
fr: Fabriqué au Luxembourg
it: Prodotto in Lussemburgo
nl: Gemaakt in Luxemburg
pl: Wyprodukowano w Luksemburgu
pt: Feito no Luxemburgo, produzido no Luxemburgo, fabricado no Luxemburgo
sv: Tillverkad i Luxemburg

lv: Kvalitatīvs produkts ražots Latvijā
xx: Kvalitatīvs produkts ražots Latvijā

lt: Lietuvos metų gaminys
xx: Lietuvos metų gaminys

en: Made in Poland
bg: Произведено в Полша
cs: Vyrobeno v Polsku
da: Fremstillet i Polen
es: Hecho en Polonia
fi: Valmistettu Puolassa
fr: Fabriqué en Pologne
hu: Lengyelországban készült
it: Prodotto in Polonia
nl: Geproduceerd in Polen
pl: Wyprodukowano w Polsce
pt: Feito na Polónia, produzido na Polónia, fabricado na Polónia, feito na Polônia, produzido na Polônia, fabricado na Polônia
ro: Produs în Polonia
ru: Произведено в Польше
sv: Tillverkad i Polen
tr: Polonya'da üretilmiştir
uk: Вироблено в Польщі

pl: Produkt polski
xx: Produkt polski

en: Polish milk
bg: Полско мляко
cs: Polské mléko
da: Polsk mælk
de: Polnische Milch
es: Leche polaca
fi: Puolalainen maito
fr: Lait polonais
hu: Lengyel tej
it: Latte polacco
nl: Pools melk
pl: polskie mleko
pt: Leite polonês
sv: Polsk mjölk

en: Made in Portugal
bg: Произведено в Португалия
de: Hergestellt in Portugal
es: Hecho en Portugal
fi: Valmistettu Portugalissa
fr: Fabriqué au Portugal
he: מיוצר בפורטוגל
hu: Portugáliában készült
it: Prodotto in Portogallo
nl: Geproduceerd in Portugal
pl: Wyprodukowano w Portugalii
pt: Feito em Portugal, produzido em Portugal, fabricado em Portugal

en: Made in Russia
bg: Произведено в Русия
de: Hergestellt in Russland
es: Hecho en Rusia
fi: Valmistettu Venäjällä
fr: Fabriqué en Russie
he: מיוצר ברוסיה
hu: Oroszországban készült
nl: Geproduceerd in Rusland
pl: Wyprodukowano w Rosjii
pt: Feito na Rússia, produzido na Rússia, fabricado na Rússia
ru: Сделано в России

si: izbrana kakovost slovenija
xx: izbrana kakovost slovenija

en: Made in Spain
bg: Произведено в Испания
ca: Fet a Espanya
de: Hergestellt in Spanien
es: Hecho en España
fi: Valmistettu Espanjassa
fr: Fabriqué en Espagne
he: נוצר בספרד
hu: Spanyolországban készült
it: Prodotto in Spagna
nl: Geproduceerd in Spanje
pl: Wyprodukowano w Hiszpanii
pt: Feito em Espanha, produzido em Espanha, fabricado em Espanha

xx: Från Sverige
sv: Från Sverige

xx: Kött från Sverige
sv: Kött från Sverige

xx: Mjölk från Sverige
sv: Mjölk från Sverige

xx: Svenskt mjöl från egen kvarn
sv: Svenskt mjöl från egen kvarn

en: Swedish potatoes
sv: Svensk potatis

en: Made in Sweden, Manufactured in Sweden
sv: Tillverkad i Sverige, Tillagat i Sverige, Producerad i Sverige